District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.22

Criminal background check.

(a)

No license or registration shall be issued to a health professional before a criminal background check has been conducted for that person. The applicant for a license or registration shall pay the fee established by the Department of Health for the criminal background check.

(b)

The criminal background check shall be obtained by the Department of Health from the U.S. Department of Justice, or from a private agency determined by the Department of Health. The results of the criminal background check shall be forwarded directly to the appropriate health licensing board.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 522
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-222, § 2, 53 DCR 10219

History